Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-910
Sections; violations; penalty.

Any individual, association, or corporation that shall violate any of the provisions of sections 48-901 to 48-912 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1959, c. 231, § 10, p. 810;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 299.